District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.29

Registration form.

(a)

Each registrant shall file a registration form with the Director of Government Ethics, signed under oath, on or before January 15th of each year, or no later than 15 days after becoming a lobbyist (and on or before January 15th of each year thereafter). If the registrant is not an individual, an authorized officer or agent of the registrant shall sign the form. A registrant shall file a separate registration form for each person from whom he or she receives compensation.

(b)

(1)

The registration shall be on a form prescribed by the Director of Government Ethics and shall include:

(A)

The registrant’s name, permanent address, and temporary address while lobbying;

(B)

The name and address of each person who will lobby on the registrant’s behalf;

(C)

The name, address, and nature of the business of any person who compensates the registrant and the terms of the compensation; and

(D)

The identification, by formal designation, if known, of matters on which the registrant expects to lobby.

(2)

The Director of Government Ethics shall publish in the District of Columbia Register on or before February 15th and on or before August 15th of each year a summary of all information required to be submitted under this subsection.

(c)

No later than 10 days after a registrant files a registration form with the Director of Government Ethics, the Director of Government Ethics shall publish on the Ethics Board’s website a summary of all information required to be submitted under this section.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 229, 59 DCR 1862
This section is referenced in § 1-1162.27, § 1-1162.28, and § 1-1162.30.